Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-725
Nebraska Hall of Fame; location.

The Nebraska Hall of Fame shall be located in the State Capitol and other locations as approved by the Nebraska Hall of Fame Commission.

Laws 1961, c. 355, § 2, p. 1118;

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 4.